North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160B. Consolidated City-County Act.
Article 1. Title and Definition.

§ 160B-1.
Title; effective date.

This Chapter shall be cited as the “Consolidated City-County Act of 1973” and is enacted pursuant to Article V, Sec. 2(4) of the North Carolina Constitution, effective July 1, 1973.

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1.

§ 160B-2.
Definitions.

In this Chapter:

“Consolidated city-county” means any county where the largest municipality in the county has been abolished and its powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities consolidated with those of the county. Other municipalities in the county, if any, may or may not have been abolished and their powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities consolidated with those of the county.

“Governing board” means the governing board of a consolidated city-county.

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1.